Nevada, session 83, AB273.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a licensed
firearm dealer is immune from civil liability for any act or
omission arising from a firearm hold agreement and resulting in
personal injury or death, including the return of any firearm to
the firearm owner by a licensed firearm dealer at the termination
of a firearm hold agreement.
-
*AB273*

– 2 –
2. A licensed firearm dealer is not immune from civil liability
pursuant to subsection 1 if any action arising from a firearm hold
agreement was the result of otherwise unlawful conduct on the
part of the licensed firearm dealer.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Firearm hold agreement” means a written or oral
agreement between an owner of a firearm and a licensed firearm
dealer in which a licensed firearm dealer:
(1) Takes physical possession of the owner’s lawfully
possessed firearm at the request of the owner;
(2) Holds the firearm for an agreed period; and
(3) Returns the firearm to the owner according to the terms
of the agreement.
(b) “Licensed firearm dealer” means a person licensed
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a cause
of action that accrues on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB273*